Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-10,134
Class V school district; sale of site; decree; appeal.

Any party to the proceedings under sections 79-10,127 to 79-10,133 shall have the right of appeal, as in other civil actions, from the final order and judgment of the district court to the Court of Appeals.

Laws 1955, c. 319, § 8, p. 987;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 146;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1068;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 780.